Maine, session 132, LD444.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3210, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 477, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3210-I, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 660, §7, is
further amended to read:
B. The commission shall evaluate the proposals received based, at a minimum, on the
following factors: cost, economic benefit to northern Maine, the qualifications of the
bidder or bidders, and the long-term viability of each proposal and the anticipated
contribution of each proposal toward the achievement by the State of its renewable
energy goals under section 3210. The commission shall disqualify any proposal that,
in the commission's determination, fails to demonstrate the bidder's technical and
financial capacity to successfully construct, develop and operate the transmission line
or lines described in this subsection and to pursue, negotiate and contract for its
interconnection with the ISO-New England system.
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §3210-I, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 660, §7, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) In the commission's determination, in the aggregate with proposals received
under subsection 3, demonstrate the most cost-effective and efficient transmission
access to renewable energy resources in northern Maine in a manner that best
supports the achievement of the State's renewable energy goals under section 3210
and that maximize maximizes benefits to the State;
Sec. 4. 35-A MRSA §3210-I, sub-§3, ¶D, as amended by PL 2023, c. 660, §8, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) In the commission's determination, in the aggregate with proposals received
under subsection 2, demonstrate the most cost‑effective and efficient development
of renewable energy resources in northern Maine in a manner that best supports
the achievement of the State's renewable energy goals under section 3210 and
maximize maximizes benefits to the State; and
Sec. 5. 35-A MRSA §3407, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 481, §5, is amended
to read:
1. Program established. The Maine Offshore Wind Renewable Energy and
Economic Development Program, referred to in this section as "the program," is established
to further the development and use of offshore wind power projects in the Gulf of Maine.
The office, in collaboration with the commission, shall administer the program in
accordance with this section and shall ensure that the program is designed to advance the
greenhouse gas emissions reduction obligations and climate policies of this State under
Title 38, section 576‑A and Title 38, section 577, the renewable energy goals established
in section 3210, subsection 1‑A and all applicable workforce development efforts of this
State. Under the program, the office, in collaboration with the commission, shall:
A. Encourage the responsible development of offshore wind power projects to stabilize
energy supply prices, reduce this State's reliance on imported fossil fuels, realize direct
and near-term economic benefits for the people of this State and ensure the
Page 1 - 132LR0864(01)

413 achievement of this State's wind energy generation goal established in section 3404,
424 subsection 2;
B. Support offshore wind power projects that result in long-term, family-supporting
careers, including for disadvantaged populations and communities;
C. Support responsibly sited and operated offshore wind power projects that avoid or
minimize and compensate for impacts to wildlife, habitat, fisheries and coastal
communities in the Gulf of Maine;
D. Support efforts to increase understanding of impacts of offshore wind power
projects on the marine environment and to advance research to better understand how
offshore wind power projects can coexist with minimal impact to existing ocean users,
wildlife, fisheries and the marine environment;
E. Promote diversity, equity and inclusion in the development of offshore wind power
projects with particular consideration given to the energy and economic circumstances
and opportunities in coastal and socially vulnerable communities and for the federally
recognized Indian tribes in this State. For the purposes of this paragraph, "socially
vulnerable communities" means those communities containing populations that are
disproportionately burdened by existing social inequities or lack the capacity to
withstand new or worsening burdens;
F. Support the advancement of port infrastructure, local offshore wind power-related
economic development and the development of a supply chain to support the
development of offshore wind power projects;
G. Support the development and deployment of innovative technologies to achieve the
energy policy and economic development objectives of this State, including energy
storage;
H. Support the use of Maine-based technical and engineering expertise and build on
this State's leadership in offshore wind power, maritime industries and research and
development;
I. Support the development of transmission infrastructure necessary for this State to
expeditiously meet its renewable energy and climate goals, including advancing the
development of shared or regional offshore wind power transmission infrastructure;
J. Collaborate with other states or entities when appropriate on regional issues,
including, but not limited to, transmission, procurement, supply chain and workforce
development and research and monitoring relating to wildlife, fisheries and the Gulf of
Maine ecosystem;
K. Support responsibly sited offshore wind power projects with generation facilities
located in areas outside of the area of the Gulf of Maine where the majority of lobster
fishing or other significant commercial fishing occurs;
L. Coordinate the activities of state agencies that are affected by the development of
offshore wind power projects, including, but not limited to, the Department of
Economic and Community Development, the Department of Labor, the Department of
Marine Resources, the Department of Transportation, the Department of Inland
Fisheries and Wildlife and the Department of Environmental Protection; and
Page 2 - 132LR0864(01)

M. Support the development of deep-water offshore wind power projects and
transmission infrastructure in the Gulf of Maine that serve the public interest by
advancing the renewable energy and climate policies and economic development goals
of this State and helping to reduce energy price volatility.
Sec. 6. 35-A MRSA §3409, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 481, §7, is
amended by amending subparagraph (3) to read:
(3) Seek to achieve the greenhouse gas emissions reduction obligations and
climate policies of this State under Title 38, section 576‑A and Title 38, section
577 and renewable energy goals under section 3210, subsection 1‑A;